Washington statutes.
RCW 17.28.410

Consolidation of districts—Powers of consolidated district—Indebtedness of former districts.

The consolidated district has all the rights, powers, duties, privileges and obligations of a district formed originally under the provisions of this chapter.

If at the time of consolidation there is outstanding an indebtedness of any of the former districts included in the consolidated district, that indebtedness shall be paid in the manner provided for the payment of indebtedness upon dissolution of a district.

A consolidated district shall not be liable for any indebtedness of any of the former districts included in it which was outstanding at the time of consolidation.

No property in any of the former districts shall be taxed to pay any indebtedness of any other former district existing at the date of the consolidation.

[ 1957 c 153 s 41.]